Mississippi, session 2026, HB1169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Whistleblower Reward Act". (2)  As used in this section, the following words have the meaning as defined in this subsection, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Audit. (b)  "Original information" means allegations not previously known by the Department of Audit and unlikely to have been discovered without disclosure by a whistleblower. (c)  "Substantial evidence" means personal knowledge and supporting documentation beyond a mere allegation. (d)  "Successful recovery of funds" means an action taken by the Department of Audit that leads to the recovery of public funds. (e) "Whistleblower" means one (1) or more persons who: (i)  Provide original information and substantial evidence that leads to a successful recovery of funds; (ii)  Cooperate continuously according to policies promulgated by the Department of Audit; (iii)  Have not knowingly participated in the fraud; (iv)  Are not employees of the Department of Audit at the time the fraud was discovered or reported; and (v)  Are not the elected officials or supervisors in charge of the department where the fraud is discovered.  State, county and municipal officials shall not be included in the definition of "whistleblower". (3)  (a)  When a whistleblower provides original information and substantial evidence of the theft or misuse of government funds or property to the department, and that evidence leads to the successful recovery of funds by the department, then the State of Mississippi, through the department, shall pay such whistleblower fifteen percent (15%) of the proceeds of the recovery; however, such payment shall not exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00). (b)  If two (2) or more persons together act as whistleblowers, the fifteen percent (15%) reward shall be disbursed in equal, pro rata shares.  In no event shall the reward paid to any such person or group of persons in relation to any recovery exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the proceeds or Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) of such recovery. (c)  The reward shall be recovered in the following manner: (i)  From the person or persons liable for such amounts and upon the surety on official bond thereof; and/or (ii)  From any individual, partnership, corporation or association to whom the illegal expenditure was made or with whom the unlawful disposition of public property was made, if such individual, partnership, corporation or association knew or had reason to know through the exercising of reasonable diligence that the expenditure was illegal or the disposition unlawful, as provided in Section 7-7-211(g). (d)  Additionally, there shall be recovered in all cases, in the same manner, from the parties listed above, the cost incurred by the department with any vendor whose services were deemed necessary by the department to fully investigate any theft or misuse of government funds or property, regardless of whether a reward is payable to a whistleblower. (e)  If, after an investigation by the department, the entity against which the theft or misuse of government funds or property was committed is repaid directly by the employee, surety bond, insurance policy, or other payor, that entity shall return fifteen percent (15%) of the funds, which shall not be more than Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00), to the Mississippi Department of Audit Exception Clearing Account, the whistleblower shall be paid from such account. (4)  (a)  The identity of a whistleblower shall remain confidential and not admissible in a court of law, unless: (i)  A judge determines after an in-camera review that such information is necessary for a criminal defendant to receive a fair trial; (ii)  A judge determines such information contains evidence that is exculpatory to a criminal defendant; or (iii)  The state or federal constitution requires the disclosure of the whistleblower's identity. (b)  Communications between the department and a whistleblower, including documents or tangible items provided or exchanged, are exempt confidential investigative reports for purposes of the Mississippi Public Records Act. (5)  This section shall only apply to whistleblowers who submit evidence to the department after the effective date of this act.  The section shall not retroactively apply to whistleblower information received before the effective date. (6)  The reward provided for in this section shall be in addition to any remedy provided under Sections 25-9-173 through 25-9-177 for reprisal or retaliatory action, if the whistle blower is entitled to such remedy by law. SECTION 2.  Section 25-61-12, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-61-12.  (1)  The home address, any telephone number of a privately paid account or other private information of any law enforcement officer, criminal investigator, judge or district attorney, or the spouse or child of the law enforcement officer, criminal investigator, judge or district attorney, shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  This exemption does not apply to any court transcript or recording if given under oath and not otherwise excluded by law. (2)  (a)  When in the possession of a law enforcement agency, investigative reports shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter; however, a law enforcement agency, in its discretion, may choose to make public all or any part of any investigative report. (b)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent any and all public bodies from having among themselves a free flow of information for the purpose of achieving a coordinated and effective detection and investigation of unlawful activity. Where the confidentiality of records covered by this section is being determined in a private hearing before a judge under Section 25-61-13, the public body may redact or separate from the records the identity of confidential informants or the identity of the person or persons under investigation or other information other than the nature of the incident, time, date and location. (c)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt from public disclosure a law enforcement incident report.  An incident report shall be a public record.  A law enforcement agency may release information in addition to the information contained in the incident report. (d)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the disclosure of information that would reveal the identity of the victim. (3)  Personal information of victims, including victim impact statements and letters of support on behalf of victims that are contained in records on file with the Mississippi Department of Corrections and State Parole Board, shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter. (4)  Records of a public hospital board relating to the purchase or sale of medical or other practices or other business operations, and the recruitment of physicians and other health care professionals, shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter. (5)  Communications between the Department of Audit and a whistleblower, including documents or tangible items provided or exchanged, shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 3.  Section 25-9-171, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-9-171.  For purposes of Sections 25-9-171 through 25-9-177, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them herein: (a)  "Abuse" means acting in an arbitrary and capricious manner that adversely affects the accomplishment of a function of any governmental entity. (b)  "Governmental entity" means a board, commission, department, office or other agency of the state or a political subdivision of the state. (c) "Employee" means any individual employed or holding office in any department or agency of state or local government. (d)  "Improper governmental action" means any action by an employee which is undertaken in the performance of the employee's official duties, whether or not the action is within the scope of the employee's employment: (i)  Which is in violation of any federal or state law or regulation, is an abuse of authority, results in substantial abuse, misuse, destruction, waste, or loss of public funds or public resources; or (ii)  Which is of substantial and specific danger to the public health or safety; or (iii)  Which is discrimination based on race or gender. "Improper governmental action" does not include personnel actions for which other remedies exist, including, but not limited to, employee grievances, complaints, appointments, promotions, transfers, assignments, reassignments, reinstatements, restorations, reemployments, performance evaluations, reductions in pay, dismissals, suspensions, demotions, violations of the state personnel system or local personnel policies, alleged labor agreement violations, reprimands, claims of discriminatory treatment, or any personnel action which may be taken under federal or state law. (e)  "Misuse" means an illegal or unauthorized use. (f)  "Personnel action" means an action that affects an employee's promotion, demotion, transfer, work assignment or performance evaluation. (g)  "State investigative body" shall mean the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi, the State Auditor, the Mississippi Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review or any other standing committee of the Legislature, or any district attorney of the State of Mississippi. (h)  "Use of official authority or influence" includes taking, directing others to take, recommending, processing or approving any personnel action such as an appointment, promotion, transfer, assignment, reassignment, reinstatement, restoration, reemployment, performance evaluation or other disciplinary action. (i)  "Waste" means an unnecessary or unreasonable expenditure or use. (j) "Whistleblower" means an employee who in good faith reports an alleged improper governmental action to a state investigative body, initiating an investigation.  For purposes of the provisions of Sections 25-9-171 through 25-7-177, the term "whistleblower" also means an employee who in good faith provides information to a state investigative body, or an employee who is believed to have reported alleged improper governmental action to a state investigative body or to have provided information to a state investigative body but who, in fact, has not reported such action or provided such information. SECTION 4.  Section 25-9-172, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-9-172.  (1)  Upon receipt of a signed written complaint of alleged improper governmental action, a state investigative body shall keep a record of the complaint and shall have the authority to investigate the complaint in accordance with its powers and duties provided by the laws of the State of Mississippi. (2)  Each state investigative body shall develop and maintain a standard form for use by the whistleblower when reporting alleged improper governmental action.  Such form shall require as a minimum the name, address and telephone number of the whistleblower, and a description of the alleged improper governmental action. (3)  If any state investigative body receives a complaint that contains allegations outside its expertise, then the state investigative body may refer the complaint to another state investigative body unless contrary to the laws of the State of Mississippi. (4)  In any case to which this section applies, the identity of the whistleblower shall be kept confidential unless the state investigative body determines that the information has been provided other than in good faith, or unless the confidentiality requirement conflicts with Article 1, Chapter 4 of this title, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 5.  Section 25-9-173, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-9-173.  (1)  No agency shall dismiss or otherwise adversely affect the compensation or employment status of any public employee because the public employee testified or provided information to a state investigative body whether or not the testimony or information is provided under oath. (2)  Any person who is a whistleblower, as defined in Section 25-9-171, and who as a result of being a whistleblower has been subjected to workplace reprisal or retaliatory action, is entitled to the remedies provided under Section 25-9-175.  For the purpose of this section, "reprisal or retaliatory action" means, but is not limited to: (a)  Unwarranted and unsubstantiated letters of reprimand or unsatisfactory performance evaluations; (b)  Demotion; (c)  Reduction in pay; (d)  Denial of promotion; (e)  Suspension; (f)  Dismissal; and (g)  Denial of employment. (3)  An employee who has filed a valid whistleblower complaint may not recover the damages and other remedies provided under Section 25-9-175 unless the dismissal or adverse action taken against him was the direct result of providing information to a state investigative body. (4)  Nothing in this section prohibits a governmental entity from making any decision exercising its authority to terminate, suspend or discipline an employee who engages in workplace reprisal or retaliatory action against a whistleblower. (5)  A governmental entity is not precluded from taking any action in accordance with established personnel policies against an employee who knowingly and intentionally provides false information to a state investigative body. SECTION 6.  Section 25-9-175, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-9-175.  Any agency which violates the provisions of Section 25-9-173 shall be liable to the public employee for back pay and reinstatement.  In addition, an employee whose employment is suspended or terminated or who is subjected to adverse personnel action in violation of Section 25-9-173 is entitled to sue for injunctive relief, compensatory damages, court costs and reasonable attorney's fees; provided, however, that an employee may not recover an amount that exceeds the limitations provided in Section 11-46-15.  Additionally, each member of any agency's governing board or authority may be found individually liable for a civil fine of up to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation of Section 25-9-173.  In any instance where the agency in violation of Section 25-9-173 has no governing board or authority, the agency's executive director may be found individually liable for a civil fine not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).  If the court determines that any action filed under this section by an employee is frivolous and unwarrantable, the court may award to the employer court costs and reasonable expenses, including attorney's fees, incurred in defense of actions brought by the employee under this section. SECTION 7.  Section 25-9-177, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-9-177.  Actions to recover civil fines and other remedies provided for under Section 25-9-175 may be instituted in the Circuit Court for the First Judicial District of Hinds County or in the circuit court of the public employee's residence.  In such actions, the public employee shall prove by a preponderance of the evidence that, but for his providing information or testimony to a state investigative body prior to occurrence of the dismissal or any adverse action, his dismissal or any adverse action taken against him would not have occurred.  Remedies provided for herein shall be supplemental to any other remedies, judicial or administrative, provided for under law.  Any administrative remedies provided for state-service employees under Sections 25-9-127 through 25-9-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, or any remedies under a grievance or appeal process of the employing governmental entity relating to suspension or termination of employment or adverse personnel action, shall not be exhausted or diminished as a result of any action taken by the employee under Section 25-9-175 and this section, and the employee shall be required to exhaust such remedies prior to instituting an action authorized under Section 25-9-175 and this section. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.